Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB606.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding sections to read:Section 529. Posting of Offers of Employment for Certain Administrators.--A board of school directors that extends an offer of employment to a person for the position of district superintendent, assistant district superintendent, associate superintendent or principal in the school district shall post the offer on the school district's publicly accessible Internet website. The posting shall include the details of the offer and proposed contract, including salary and the term of the 12345678910111213141516171819202122 contract. The posting shall occur after the offer is made to the person and at least two weeks before the board of school directors officially approves the contract.Section 925-A. Posting of Offers of Employment for Certain Staff.--A board of intermediate unit directors that extends an offer of employment to a person for the position of executive director or assistant executive director shall post the offer on the intermediate unit's publicly accessible Internet website. The posting shall include the details of the offer and proposed contract, including salary and the term of the contract. The posting shall occur after the offer is made to the person and at least two weeks before the board officially approves the contract.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0606PN0614 - 2 - 1234567891011121314